Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 4. Certificates of Purchase and Redemption

38-38-401.
Certificate of purchase - issuance.

No later than five business days after the sale, the officer shall execute and record in each county where the property or a portion thereof is located a certificate of purchase containing:

The names of the original grantors of the deed of trust being foreclosed;

The description of the property;

The sum paid for the property;

The name and address of the purchaser;

A statement that the purchaser or assignee of the certificate of purchase shall be entitled to a confirmation deed at the expiration of all redemption periods provided under part 3 of this article unless a redemption is made;

The deficiency under the evidence of debt, if any, as a result of the successful bid at sale;

The public trustee’s sale number or, in the case of a sale by the sheriff, the district court civil action number;

The date of sale;

An attached exhibit containing a copy of the executed order authorizing the sale that bears the public trustee sale number or civil docket number in the case of a judicial foreclosure; and

An attached exhibit containing a copy of the mailing list and all amended mailing lists bearing the public trustee sale number or civil docket number in the case of a judicial foreclosure.

The officer shall retain the recorded certificate of purchase in the officer’s records.

The failure of the officer to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of the sale or the vesting of title in the name of the holder of the certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1668, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1472, § 24, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(1)(h) and (1)(i) added, p.1843, § 18, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) and (1)(i) amended and (1)(a.5) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 719, § 15, effective January 1, 2010.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-115, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-401.5.
Certificate - priority of lien.

The lien represented by a certificate of purchase shall have the same priority as the deed of trust or other lien foreclosed.

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1844, § 20, effective January 1, 2008.

38-38-402.
Certificate of redemption - issuance.

No sooner than fifteen business days following a sale but no later than five business days following an officer’s receipt of redemption money paid under section 38-38-302, the officer shall execute and record in each county where the property or a portion thereof is located a certificate of redemption containing:

The names of the original grantors of the deed of trust being foreclosed;

The name and address of the person redeeming;

The redemption amount paid;

The date of sale;

The description of the property redeemed; and

The public trustee’s sale number or, in the case of a sale by the sheriff, the district court civil action number.

The officer shall retain the recorded certificate of redemption in the officer’s records.

The failure of the officer to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of the sale or the rights of the grantee of the confirmation deed.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1668, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1348, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1473, § 25, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(a.5) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 719, § 16, effective January 1, 2010.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-104, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-403.
Certificates assignable.

Every certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption that is issued to any person under this part 4 shall be assignable by indorsement thereon or by separate assignment, and the assignee shall be treated for all purposes as the original holder of the certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption. A separate assignment of a certificate of purchase or a certificate of redemption shall contain:

The name and address of the assignee;

The name and address of the assignor;

A description of the property;

The name of the foreclosing holder of the evidence of debt; and

The number of the foreclosure sale held by the public trustee or the case number of the judicial foreclosure.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1668, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 399, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1473, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1843, § 19, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-39-116, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-38-404.
Replacement certificate issued in case of loss of original - repeal. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1669, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(4) added by revision, p. 1481, §§ 40, 41.

Editor’s note:

(1) Prior to its repeal in 2007, this section was similar to former § 38-37-121, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2007. The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-405.
Certificate as prima facie evidence.

A certificate of purchase, certificate of redemption, confirmation deed, or a certified copy thereof shall be deemed to be prima facie evidence of all statements or recitals contained therein.

History.

Source:
L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1473, § 27, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for the enactment of this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)